Hawaii statutes.
§392-78 Recovery of benefits paid;
individual's liability to repay benefits; insurer's appeal rights. (a)
Any person who has received any amount as benefits under this chapter to which
the person was not entitled shall be liable for such amount unless the
overpayment was received without fault on the part of the recipient and its
recovery would be against equity and good conscience. Notice of a
reconsideration under section 392-79 in such cases shall specify that the
person is liable to repay the amount of overpaid benefits, the basis of the
overpayment, and the week or weeks for which such benefits were paid.

(b) The person liable shall, in the discretion
of the referee, either repay such amount or have the amount deducted from any
future benefits payable under this chapter within two years after the date of
mailing of the notice of reconsideration or the final decision on an appeal
from such reconsideration.

(c) In any case in which under this section an
individual is liable to repay any amount, the amount shall be payable without
interest.

(d) In accordance with sections 392-71 and
392-72, an insurer, self-insured employer or the trust fund for disability
benefits shall have a right to appeal for the recovery of disability benefits
which were overpaid an employee. Subsections (a) through (c) shall be
applicable in the recovery of overpaid benefits. [L 1969, c 148, pt of §1; am L
1981, c 14, §1; gen ch 1985; am L 2013, c 100, §8]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next